District of Columbia statutes.
7-2504.07

Display of firearms or ammunition by dealers; security; employees of dealers.

(a)

No licensed dealer shall display any firearm or ammunition in windows visible from a street or sidewalk. All firearms, destructive devices, and ammunition shall be kept at all times in a securely locked place affixed to the premises except when being shown to a customer, being repaired, or otherwise being worked on.

(b)

No licensee shall knowingly employ any person in his establishment if such person would not be eligible to register a firearm under this unit.

History

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title IV, § 407, 23 DCR 2464

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2347.
1973 Ed., § 6-1847.